Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.220

Retirement fund—Expenses.

The Washington state patrol retirement fund shall be the fund from which shall be paid all retirement allowances or benefits in lieu thereof which are payable as provided herein. The expenses of operating the retirement system shall be paid from appropriations made for the operation of the Washington state patrol.

[ 1989 c 273 s 25; 1973 1st ex.s. c 180 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.43.220. Prior: 1961 c 93 s 1; 1957 c 162 s 2; 1951 c 140 s 3; 1947 c 250 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 6362-91.]